District of Columbia statutes.
16-1319

Payment of award; transfer of title.

If the appraisement of the jury pursuant to section 16-1317 is not objected to by the parties interested, it shall be confirmed by the court, or, if the appraisement of the new jury is confirmed by the court, the Mayor shall pay the amount awarded by the jury out of the appropriation made therefor or deposit it in the manner as directed by section 9-1217.24 [repealed], and thereupon the title to the property condemned shall vest in the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(7)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 4(i), 35 DCR 147

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1314.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1319.
1973 Ed., § 16-1319.

References in Text

Section 9-1217.24, referred to in this section, was repealed by D.C. Law 4-201,§ 19, effective March 10, 1983.